Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB491.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6329. Concurrent jurisdiction on military installations.The jurisdiction of a court in a proceeding under this chapter shall be concurrent with that of a Federal court sitting in this Commonwealth over proceedings involving a violation of Federal law committed by a child on a military installation of the United States Department of Defense if:(1) The Federal court OR AN ATTORNEY AUTHORIZED TO MAKE DECISIONS CONCERNING PROSECUTION ON BEHALF OF THE UNITED STATES, INCLUDING A UNITED STATES ATTORNEY OR JUDGE ADVOCATE GENERAL, waives exclusive jurisdiction. <--123456789101112131415161718 (2) The violation of Federal law is also a crime under the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0491PN1294 - 2 - 123